District of Columbia statutes.
5-606

Compromise, release or waiver of claim.

To the extent prescribed by regulations under § 5-605, the Mayor may:

(1)

Compromise or settle and execute a release of any claim which the District of Columbia has by virtue of the rights established by § 5-602, § 5-603, or § 5-604; or

(2)

For the convenience of the District of Columbia, or if the Mayor determines that collection would result in undue hardship upon the policeman or fireman who suffered the injury or disease resulting in care and treatment described in § 5-602, or upon his dependents or survivors, waive any such claim in whole or in part.

Aug. 17, 1978, D.C. Law 2-100, § 7, 25 DCR 288
1973 Ed., § 4-1006.
1981 Ed., § 4-506.